Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-219
Project, defined.

Project shall mean one or more of the following:

(1)(a) Rental housing;

(b) Residential housing; and

(c) Residential energy conservation devices;

(2) Agriculture or agricultural enterprise;

(3) Any land, building, or other improvement, any real or personal property, or any equipment and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, whether or not in existence, suitable or used for or in connection with any of the following revenue-producing enterprises or two or more such enterprises engaged or to be engaged in:

(a) In all areas of the state, manufacturing or industrial enterprises, including assembling, fabricating, mixing, processing, warehousing, distributing, or transporting any products of agriculture, forestry, mining, industry, or manufacturing; pollution control facilities; and facilities incident to the development of industrial sites, including land costs and the costs of site improvements such as drainage, water, storm, and sanitary sewers, grading, streets, and other facilities and structures incidental to the use of such sites for manufacturing or industrial enterprises;

(b) In all areas of the state, service enterprises if (i) such facilities constitute new construction or rehabilitation, including hotels or motels, sports and recreation facilities available for use by members of the general public either as participants or spectators, and convention or trade show facilities, (ii) such facilities do not or will not derive a significant portion of their gross receipts from retail sales or utilize a significant portion of their total area for retail sales, and (iii) such facilities are owned or to be owned by a nonprofit entity or a public agency;

(c) In blighted areas of the state, service and business enterprises if such facilities constitute new construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation, including, but not limited to, those enterprises specified in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, office buildings, and retail businesses if such facilities are owned or to be owned by a nonprofit entity or a public agency; and

(d) In all areas of the state, any land, building, or other improvement and all real or personal property, including furniture and equipment, and any undivided or other interest in any such property, whether or not in existence, suitable or used for or in connection with any hospital, nursing home, nonprofit child care facility, or facilities related and subordinate thereto.

Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to include any rental or residential housing, residential energy conservation device, or agriculture or agricultural enterprise;

(4) Any land, building, or other improvement, any real or personal property, or any equipment and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, whether or not in existence, used by a nonprofit entity as an office building, but only if (a) the principal long-term occupant or occupants thereof initially employ at least fifty people, (b) the office building will be used by the principal long-term occupant or occupants as a national, regional, or divisional office, (c) the principal long-term occupant or occupants are engaged in a multistate operation, and (d) the authority makes the findings specified in subdivision (1) of section 58-251;

(5) Wastewater treatment or safe drinking water project which shall include any project or undertaking which involves the construction, development, rehabilitation, and improvement of wastewater treatment facilities or safe drinking water facilities and is financed by a loan from or otherwise provided financial assistance by the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund or any comparable state fund providing money for the financing of safe drinking water facilities;

(6) Any cost necessary for abatement of an environmental hazard or hazards in school buildings or on school grounds upon a determination by the school that an actual or potential environmental hazard exists in the school buildings or on the school grounds under its control;

(7) Any accessibility barrier elimination project costs necessary for accessibility barrier elimination in school buildings or on school grounds upon a determination by the school that an actual or potential accessibility barrier exists in the school buildings or on the school grounds under its control;

(8) Solid waste disposal project which shall include land, buildings, equipment, and improvements consisting of all or part of an area or a facility for the disposal of solid waste, including recycling of waste materials, either publicly or privately owned or operated, and any project or program undertaken by a county, city, village, or entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act for closure, monitoring, or remediation of an existing solid waste disposal area or facility and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing;

(9) Any affordable housing infrastructure which shall include streets, sewers, storm drains, water, broadband, electrical and other utilities, sidewalks, public parks, public playgrounds, public swimming pools, public recreational facilities, and other community facilities, easements, and similar use rights thereof, as well as improvements preparatory to the development of housing units;

(10) Any public safety communication project, including land, buildings, equipment, easements, licenses, and leasehold interests, and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, held for or on behalf of any public safety communication system owned or operated by (a) a joint entity providing public safety communications and created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or (b) a joint public agency providing public safety communications and created pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act; and

(11) Economic-impact projects.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 372, § 10;

Laws 1984, LB 1084, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 22;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 69;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 78;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 693, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 36.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.